zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 拳擊與武術 > 拳擊與武術訓練裝備 > 拳擊沙袋: 拳擊訓練假人; 拳擊訓練雙頭袋; 重型拳擊訓練袋; 拳擊訓練球; 立式拳擊訓練袋; 拳擊訓練護具; 拳擊速度沙袋球; 拳擊訓練沙包; 拳擊訓練壁掛球
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Boksing og kampsport > Treningsutstyr for boksing og kampsport > Punching- og treningsbager: Motstandersekker for slag og trening; Doble sekker for slag og trening; Tunge sekker for slag og trening; Maissekker for slag og trening; Pidestallsekker for slag og trening; Slagputer for slag og trening; Hurtigsekker for slag og trening; Uppercutsekker for slag og trening; Veggsekker for slag og trening
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Box și arte marțiale > Echipament de antrenament pentru box și arte marțiale > Saci de box și antrenament: Saci adversar pentru lovituri și antrenament; Saci cu două capete pentru lovituri și antrenament; Saci grei pentru lovituri și antrenament; Saci cu porumb pentru lovituri și antrenament; Saci cu suport pentru lovituri și antrenament; Paduri pentru lovituri și antrenament; Saci de viteză pentru lovituri și antrenament; Saci upercut pentru lovituri și antrenament; Saci de perete pentru lovituri și antrenament
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Boxing & Martial Arts > Boxing & Martial Arts Training Equipment > Punching & Training Bags: Punching & Training Body Opponent Bags; Punching & Training Double-End Bags; Punching & Training Heavy Bags; Punching & Training Maize Bags; Punching & Training Pedestal Bags; Punching & Training Punch Pads; Punching & Training Speed Bags; Punching & Training Uppercut Bags; Punching & Training Wall Bags
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Boxe e arti marziali > Attrezzature per l'allenamento per boxe e arti marziali > Sacchi da pugilato: Sacche da pugilato per allenamento con avversario; Sacchi a doppia estremità da boxe e allenamento; Sacche pesanti da pugilato; Sacchi di mais da boxe e allenamento; Borse da allenamento e da boxe; Cuscinetti per boxe e allenamento; Sacche da boxe e da allenamento velocità; Borse con montanti da allenamento e da boxe; Borse da parete per boxe e allenamento
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Đấm bốc & Võ thuật > Thiết bị tập luyện đấm bốc & võ thuật > Bao cát đấm bốc: Bao cát bộ phận cơ thể để tập luyện đấm bốc; Túi tập luyện đấm bốc hai đầu; Bao cát nặng để tập luyện đấm bốc; Bao tập luyện đấm bốc nhồi ngô; Bao cát có bệ tập luyện đấm bốc; Đệm đỡ tập luyện đấm bốc; Bóng tập phản xạ đấm bốc; Bao cát ngang tập đấm bốc; Bao cát gắn tường tập đấm bốc
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Бокс и бойни изкуства > Оборудване за тренировки по бокс и бойни изкуства > Боксови чували и круши: Манекени за удари и тренировки; Разтягащи се круши за удари и тренировки; Висящи тежки чували за удари и тренировки; Чували тип „сълза“ за удари и тренировки; Закрепени на земята чували за удари и тренировки; Щитове за ръце за удари и тренировка; Чували за скорост при удари и тренировки; Чували за ъперкът за удари и тренировки; Стенни чували за удари и тренировки
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Boxe et arts martiaux > Équipement d'entraînement à la boxe et aux arts martiaux > Punching-balls: Punching-balls pour adversaires; Punching-balls à double extrémité; Punching-balls lourds; Sacs de frappe; Punching-balls sur pied; Tapis de punching-balls; Poires de vitesse; Poires Uppercut; Punching-balls muraux
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Box a bojové umenia > Tréningové vybavenie na box a bojové umenia > Boxovacie a tréningové vrecia: Boxovacie a tréningové vrecia s telom súpera; Boxovacie a tréningové obojstranné vrecia; Boxovacie a tréningové ťažké vrecia; Boxovacie a tréningové hrušky; Boxovacie a tréningové vrecia na podstavci; Udieracie a tréningové podložky; Boxovacie a tréningové hrušky so zavesením; Boxovacie a tréningové hákové vrecia; Boxovacie a tréningové nástenné vrecia
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Boxe e artes marciais > Equipamento de treino para boxe e artes marciais > Sacos de treino e de boxe: Sacos corporais de oponente para treino e boxe; Sacos duplos para treino e boxe; Sacos pesados para treino e boxe; Sacos de milho para treino e boxe; Sacos de pedestal para treino e boxe; Almofadas de soco para treino e boxe; Bolas de velocidade para treino e boxe; Sacos de uppercut para treino e boxe; Sacos de parede para treino e boxe
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ボクシング・格闘技 > ボクシング・格闘技用練習器具 > サンドバッグ: 人型サンドバッグ; ダブルエンドパンチングボール; ヘビーサンドバッグ; トウモロコシ形サンドバッグ; 床置きサンドバッグ; サンドバッグパッド; スピードボール; アッパーカットサンドバッグ; ウォールバッグ
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 拳击/武术 > 拳击/武术训练设备 > 拳击/训练沙袋: 拳击/训练假人沙袋; 拳击/训练双头沙袋; 拳击/训练重沙袋; 拳击/训练玉米沙袋; 拳击/训练底座沙袋; 打孔和训练击拳靶; 拳击/训练梨球; 拳击/训练上勾拳沙袋; 拳击/训练墙壁式沙袋
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Boksz és harcművészetek > Boksz- és harcművészeti edzőfelszerelések > Boksz- és edzőzsákok: Boksz és edző testellenfél-zsákok; Boksz és edző dupla végű zsákok; Box- és edző nehéz zsákok; Boksz és edző kukoricazsákok; Boksz és edző talpazatos zsákok; Boksz és edző kukoricazsákok; Boksz és edző gyorszsákok; Boksz és edző felütőzsákok; Boksz és edző faltáskák
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Πυγμαχία & πολεμικές τέχνες > Εξοπλισμός προπόνησης πυγμαχίας & πολεμικών τεχνών > Σάκοι προπόνησης & χτυπήματος: Σάκοι προπόνησης & χτυπήματος αντιπάλου; Σάκοι διπλού άκρου προπόνησης & χτυπήματος; Βαρείς σάκοι προπόνησης; Σάκοι με καλαμπόκι προπόνησης & χτυπήματος; Σάκοι πελμάτων προπόνησης & χτυπήματος; Μαξιλάρια χτυπήματος προπόνησης & χτυπήματος; Σάκοι ταχύτητας προπόνησης & χτυπήματος; Σάκοι άπερκατ προπόνησης & χτυπήματος; Σάκοι τοίχου προπόνησης & χτυπήματος
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Boxen & Kampfsport > Trainingsausrüstung für Boxen & Kampfsport > Box- & Trainingssäcke: Box- und Trainingsdummy; Box- und Trainings-Doppelendball; Schwere Box- & Trainingssäcke; Stanz- und Trainingsmaisbirnen; Stehende Boxsäcke; Pratzen und Schlagpolster; Boxbirnen; Uppercut-Boxsäcke; Wandschlagpolster
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Boks i borilačke vještine > Oprema za trening boksa i borilačkih vještina > Vreće za boksanje i vježbanje: Protivničke boks lutke za udaranje i vježbanje; Refleksna lopta za udaranje i vježbanje; Teške vreće za udaranje i vježbanje; Kruške za udaranje i vježbanje; Vreće s postoljem za udaranje i vježbanje; Jastučići za udaranje i vježbanje; Vreće za brzinu za udaranje i vježbanje; Aperkat vreće za udaranje i vježbanje; Zidne vreće za udaranje i vježbanje
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Boks ve Dövüş Sporları > Boks ve Dövüş Sporları Eğitim Ekipmanları > Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Torbaları: Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Vücut Rakip Torbaları; Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Çift Uçlu Torbaları; Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Ağır Torbaları; Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Torbaları; Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Kaide Torbaları; Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Pedleri; Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Hız Torbaları; Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Aparkat Torbaları; Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Duvar Çantaları
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Nyrkkeily ja vapaaottelu > Nyrkkeilyn ja vapaaottelun harjoitteluvälineet > Nyrkkeily- ja harjoitussäkit: Nyrkkeily- ja harjoitussäkit vastustajana; Kaksipäiset nyrkkeily- ja harjoitussäkit; Raskaat nyrkkeily- ja harjoitussäkit; Nyrkkeily- ja harjoitusmaissisäkit; Nyrkkeily- ja harjoitustelinesäkit; Nyrkkeily- ja harjoituslyöntisäkit; Nyrkkeily- ja harjoitusnopeussäkit; Nyrkkeily- ja harjoitusalakoukkusäkit; Nyrkkeily- ja harjoitusseinäsäkit
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Box a bojové sporty > Tréninkové vybavení na box a bojové sporty > Boxovací pytle: Boxovací pytle – figuríny; Boxovací pytle – dvojité boxovací míče; Boxovací pytle – těžké; Boxovací pytle – hrušky („kukuřičné“); Boxovací pytle – na pevném podstavci; Boxovací pytle – boxerské podložky; Boxovací pytle – rychlostní boxovací hrušky; Boxovací pytle – uppercut; Boxovací pytle – tréninkové bloky na zeď
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Boks in borilne veščine > Oprema za vadbo boksa in borilnih veščin > Torbe za boksarske vreče in vreče za vadbo: Boksarske vreče in vreče za vadbo za nasprotnika; Dvojne boksarske vreče in vreče za vadbo; Velike boksarske vreče in vreče za vadbo; Koruzne boksarske vreče in vreče za vadbo; Boksarske vreče in vreče za vadbo na podstavku; Udarne blazinice za boksarske vreče in vreče za vadbo; Vreče za hitrostno boksanje in vadbo; Vreče za aperkat za boksanje in vadbo; Stenske vreče za boksanje in vadbo
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Boxeo y artes marciales > Equipamiento de entrenamiento para boxeo y artes marciales > Punchings y sacos de entrenamiento: Sacos para oponentes corporales para punchings y entrenamiento; Sacos de doble extremo para punchings y entrenamiento; Sacos pesados para punchings y entrenamiento; Sacos de maíz para punchings y entrenamiento; Sacos de pedestal para punchings y entrenamiento; Almohadillas para punchings y entrenamiento; Sacos de velocidad para punchings y entrenamiento; Sacos Uppercut de punchings y entrenamiento; Sacos de pared para punchings y entrenamiento
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Бокс и единоборства > Тренировочный инвентарь для бокса и единоборств > Груши и мешки: Груши-манекены; Груши на растяжках; Подвесные тяжелые мешки; Каплевидные груши; Напольные груши и мешки; Настенные груши-подушки; Пневматические груши и мешки; Апперкотные груши и мешки; Настенные мешки
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 권투/무술 > 권투/무술 훈련 장비 > 샌드백: 사람 모형 샌드백; 더블 엔드 샌드백; 헤비 샌드백; 메이즈 샌드백; 스탠딩 샌드백; 펀치 패드 샌드백; 스피드 샌드백; 어퍼컷 샌드백; 벽면 샌드백
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Boksning og kampsport > Træningsudstyr til boksning og kampsport > Bokse- og træningspuder: Boksning og træning – modstanderpuder; Boksning og træning – dobbeltendede puder; Boksning og træning – tunge puder; Boksning og træning – majspuder; Boksning og træning – høje puder; Boksning og træning – boksepuder; Boksning og træning – fartpuder; Boksning og træning – uppercut-puder; Boksning og træning – vægpuder
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Boks i sztuki walki > Trening bokserski i sztuk walki > Worki treningowe: Manekiny treningowe; Piłka refleksowa; Worki treningowe ciężkie; Worki treningowe wypełnione kukurydzą; Worki treningowe na cokole; Podkładki pod worki treningowe; Gruszki bokserskie; Worki treningowe górne; Worki treningowe naścienne
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Boxning och kampsporter > Träningsutrustning för boxning och kampsporter > Sandsäckar och träningssäckar: Sandsäckar och träningssäckar för kroppsmotståndare; Sand- och träningssäckar med dubbla ändar; Tunga sandsäckar och träningssäckar; Majspåsar för sandsäckar och träningssäckar; Sand- och träningspiedestalsäckar; Slag- och träningsplattor; Päronbollar för slag och träning; Uppercut-säckar för slag och träning; Väggsäckar för slag och träning
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Boksen en vechtsporten > Benodigdheden voor boks- en vechtsporttraining > Stootzakken: Stootzakken in de vorm van het lichaam van een tegenstander; Stootzakken met dubbel uiteinde; Zware stootzakken; Maïsstootzakken; Stootzakken met sokkel; Stootpads; Snelheidsstootzakken; Uppercutstootzakken; Muurstootzakken
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Boxe e artes marciais > Equipamento de treinamento para boxe e artes marciais > Sacos de boxe: Sacos de pancada de oponentes corporais para treinos; Sacos de pancada duplos para treinos; Sacos de pancada pesados para treinos; Sacos de pancada gota para treinos; Sacos de pancada de pedestal para treinos; Sacos de pancada oito para treinos; Sacos de pancada de velocidade para treinos; Sacos de pancada de treinamento para uppercut; Sacos de pancada de parede para treinos
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > มวยและศิลปะการต่อสู้ > อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมสำหรับมวยและศิลปะการต่อสู้ > กระสอบทราย: กระสอบทรายแบบรูปทรงร่างกายเป้าหมาย; กระสอบทรายแบบปลายคู่; กระสอบทรายแบบหนัก; กระสอบทรายแบบแขวน; กระสอบทรายแบบตั้งพื้น; กระสอบทรายแบบป้ายชก; กระสอบทรายแบบรวดเร็ว; กระสอบทรายแบบฝึกอัปเปอร์คัต; กระสอบทรายติดผนัง
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Boksas ir kovos menai > Bokso ir kovos menų treniruočių įranga > Bokso maišai ir kriaušės: Manekenai smūgiavimui; Dviejų galų bokso maišai; Sunkūs bokso maišai; Bokso kriaušės; Bokso maišai ir kriaušės su stovais; Makivaros; Bokso kriaušės greičiui ugdyti; Bokso maišai ir kriaušės aperkotui treniruoti; Sieniniai bokso maišai ir kriaušės